test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_kutka_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - mirkkâ:
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: mirkkâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: miirhâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: miirhâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: miirkân
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: miirhâst
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Com: mirháin
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: miˊrhâttáá
    mirkkâ+N+Ess: mirkkân
    mirkkâ+N+Par: mirkkâd
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: miirhah
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [miirhâi, miˊrhâi]
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: miirhâid
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: mirháid
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: miirhâin
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Com: miˊrhâiguin
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: miˊrhâittáá

  Noun - merkkâ:
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: merkkâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: meerhâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: meerhâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: meerkân
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: meerhâst
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Com: merháin
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: meˊrhâttáá
    merkkâ+N+Ess: merkkân
    merkkâ+N+Par: merkkâd
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: meerhah
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [meerhâi, meˊrhâi]
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: meerhâid
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: merháid
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: meerhâin
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Com: meˊrhâiguin
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: meˊrhâittáá


  Noun - lavkkâ:
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: lavkkâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavhâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavhâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: laavkân
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavhâst
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Com: lavháin
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: laˊvhâttáá
    lavkkâ+N+Ess: lavkkân
    lavkkâ+N+Par: lavkkâd
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavhah
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laavhâi, laˊvhâi]
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavhâid
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavháid
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavhâin
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Com: laˊvhâiguin
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: laˊvhâittáá

  Noun - korkkâ:
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: korkkâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: koorhâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: koorhâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: koorkân
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: koorhâst
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Com: korháin
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: koˊrhâttáá
    korkkâ+N+Ess: korkkân
    korkkâ+N+Par: korkkâd
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: koorhah
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koorhâi, koˊrhâi]
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: koorhâid
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: korháid
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: koorhâin
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Com: koˊrhâiguin
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: koˊrhâittáá

  Noun - tulkkâ:
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: tulkkâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuulhâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: tuulhâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuulkân
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuulhâst
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Com: tulháin
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: tuˊlhâttáá
    tulkkâ+N+Ess: tulkkân
    tulkkâ+N+Par: tulkkâd
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: tuulhah
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [tuulhâi, tuˊlhâi]
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: tuulhâid
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: tulháid
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: tuulhâin
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Com: tuˊlhâiguin
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: tuˊlhâittáá

  Noun - jotkâ:
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Nom: jotkâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Gen: joođhâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Acc: joođhâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Ill: jootkân
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Loc: joođhâst
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Com: jođháin
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Abe: joˊđhâttáá
    jotkâ+N+Ess: jotkân
    jotkâ+N+Par: jotkâd
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Nom: joođhah
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [joođhâi, joˊđhâi]
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Acc: joođhâid
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Ill: jođháid
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Loc: joođhâin
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Com: joˊđhâiguin
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Abe: joˊđhâittáá
